Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 13.27.400.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 13.27.410.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes 15 U.S.C. 7001, et seq. (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act), but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009 “15 U.S.C. 7003(b)” was substituted for “15 U.S.C. 7003(6)” to correct a manifest typographical error in ch. 53, SLA 2008.

Sec. 13.27.420.
Relation to AS 13.26.

Nothing in this chapter limits the rights of an incapacitated person available in a guardianship or conservatorship proceeding in this state under AS 13.26.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)